Utah statutes.
32A-6-201 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Application and renewal requirements.

(1)  Each application for a public service permit shall, in addition to the requirements of Section  32A-6-102, include:

(a)  a nonrefundable $50 application fee;

(b)  a $200 initial permit fee;

(c)  the total of regularly numbered flights, trains, buses, boats, or other types of conveyance for which the applicant plans to use the special use permit;

(d)  written consent of the local authority;

(e)  a cash or corporate surety bond in the penal sum of $1,000 payable to the department, which the permittee has procured and must maintain for so long as the permittee continues to operate as a special use permittee;

(f)  a floor plan of any room or facility in which the applicant plans to establish a hospitality room where the sale or service of alcoholic beverages is made to persons then in transit, using the host company's airline, railroad, or other public conveyance; and

(g)  evidence of proximity of a proposed hospitality room to the arrival and departure area used by persons traveling on the host company's airline, railroad, bus, or other public conveyance.

(2)  Each public service permittee shall remit to the department an annual public service permit fee of $30 for each regularly numbered passenger airplane flight, passenger train, or any other regularly scheduled public conveyance upon which  alcoholic beverages are sold or served.

(3) (a)  The bond required under Subsection (1) shall be in a form approved by the attorney general, conditioned upon the permittee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of the commission.

(b)  If the surety bond is canceled due to the permittee's negligence a $300 reinstatement fee may be assessed.

(c)  No part of any cash bond so posted may be withdrawn during the period the permit is in effect.

(d)  A bond filed by a permittee may be forfeited if the permit is finally revoked.

